dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="ب/ولْنا__vblex_caus1">
      <e><p>          <l>ُلانا</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلانے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤ</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤ</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤ</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤ</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلا</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤ</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلا</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤ</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤ</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاؤ</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلائیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتا</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتی</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتی</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتا</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتی</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتی</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتا</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتی</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتا</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتے</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتی</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ُلاتیں</l><r>ولْنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="بولْنا"><i>ب</i><par n="ب/ولْنا__vblex_caus1"/></e>
